Wisconsin, session 2025, SB214.
do enact as follows:SB214,1gSection 1g. 440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 76, is amended to read:440.03 (9) (a) (intro.) Subject to pars. (b) and (c) and s. 458.33 (2) (b) and (5), the department shall, biennially, determine each fee for an initial credential for which no examination is required, for a reciprocal credential, for a telehealth registration, and for a credential renewal and any fees imposed under ss. 447.51 (2), 448.986 (2), 448.9875 (2), 448.9885 (2), 448.9888 (2), 448.98895 (2), 457.51 (2), and 459.71 (2) by doing all of the following:SB214,1mSection 1m. 440.05 (3) of the statutes is created to read:440.05 (3) Telehealth registration under s. 440.18: an amount determined by the department under s. 440.03 (9) (a), except that no fee is required under this subsection for an individual who is eligible for the veterans fee waiver program under s. 45.44.SB214,1rSection 1r. 440.18 of the statutes is created to read:440.18 Registration of out-of-state telehealth providers. (1) An individual who possesses a license, permit, registration, or other approval as a health care provider in another state may provide health care services by telehealth to patients located in this state if the health care provider registers with the department or any credentialing board, as applicable to the health care provider’s practice, and provides health care services within the scope of practice established under the laws and rules of this state that apply to the health care provider’s practice.(2) The department or any credentialing board, as applicable, shall register a health care provider who does not possess a credential in this state as a telehealth provider under this section if the health care provider satisfies all of the following:(a) The health care provider submits an application on a form prescribed by the department and pays the fee specified under s. 440.05 (3).(b) The health care provider possesses a license, permit, certificate, or other approval issued by a governmental authority in another state, the District of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States that is active and unencumbered and that entitles the health care provider to perform health care services that are substantially similar to health care services that may be performed by a health care provider who possesses a credential issued by the department or a credentialing board in this state.(c) The health care provider has not been subject to any disciplinary action relating to his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval during the 5-year period immediately preceding submission of the health care provider’s application under par. (a) that has resulted in his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval being limited, suspended, or revoked.(d) The health care provider designates an agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state on a form prescribed by the department.(e) The health care provider demonstrates to the department or any credentialing board, as applicable, that the health care provider is in compliance with sub. (5).(3) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services in this state under sub. (2) shall be issued a unique telehealth provider identification number.(4) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section shall notify the department or credentialing board, as applicable, of restrictions placed on his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval in any state or jurisdiction and of any disciplinary action taken or pending against him or her in any state or jurisdiction. Notification under this subsection shall be provided within 5 business days after the restriction is placed or disciplinary action is initiated or taken.(5) Any health care provider registered under this section shall maintain and have in effect malpractice liability insurance coverage that covers services provided to patients in this state and that is evidenced by personal liability coverage in the amounts specified for health care providers under s. 655.23 (4) or by coverage under a group liability policy providing individual coverage for the health care provider in the amounts specified under s. 655.23 (4).(6) A health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section may not open an office in this state and may not provide in-person health care services to patients located in this state unless the health care provider obtains a credential in this state and provides in-person health care services only within the scope of that credential.(7) The department shall publish on its website a list of all health care providers registered to provide telehealth services under this section and include, to the extent applicable, all of the following:(a) The registrant’s name.(b) The registrant’s health care occupation.(c) A brief explanation of the registrant’s training and education, including completion dates and any certificates or degrees obtained.(d) The registrant’s out-of-state health care license, permit, certificate, or other approval, including any identification number associated with the registrant’s license, permit, certificate, or other approval.(e) The registrant’s telehealth provider identification number issued under sub. (3).(f) The registrant’s specialty.(g) Whether the registrant is board certified and by which board the registrant is board certified.(h) A 5-year disciplinary history of the registrant.(i) The registrant’s medical malpractice insurance provider and any policy limits under the registrant’s medical malpractice insurance coverage.(j) The name and address of the registrant’s agent designated for service of process in this state under sub. (2) (d).(8) (a) Subject to par. (am), the department or the applicable credentialing board may take disciplinary action against a health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section if any of the following applies to the registrant:2. The registrant has restrictions placed on his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval or disciplinary action has been commenced against the registrant in any state or jurisdiction.3. The registrant violates any of the requirements under this section.4. The registrant commits any act that constitutes grounds for disciplinary action applicable to the registrant’s health care practice in this state.(am) The department or the applicable credentialing board shall permanently revoke the registration of any registrant who has failed to notify the department or the applicable credentialing board of any adverse actions taken against his or her license, permit, certificate, or other approval as required under sub. (4).(b) Disciplinary action taken by the department or the applicable credentialing board under par. (a) against a health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section may include suspension or revocation of the registrant’s registration under this section. A suspension of the registration of a health care provider registered to provide telehealth services under this section may be accompanied by a corrective action plan as determined by the department or the applicable credentialing board, the completion of which may lead to the suspended registration being reinstated.(9) This section does not apply to a health care provider who provides services through telehealth as provided in s. 440.094 (3).(10) (a) Registration to provide telehealth services in this state under this section expires on the renewal date specified in s. 440.08 (2) (a) that is applicable to the health care provider’s practice. The department or credentialing board, as appropriate, shall inform a health care provider registered under this section of the applicable renewal date upon registration.(b) The department or credentialing board, as appropriate, shall renew a registration under this section for an applicant who satisfies the requirements for registration under sub. (2).SB214,2Section 2. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb214 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb214 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB214 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB214 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB214: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting